Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5621XS (3) 91 lh/jh S.F. 2157 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 611.24 Malicious prosecution ââ 1 civil actions between private parties. 2 1. As used in this section: 3 a. âMaliceâ means the initiation of a civil action for a 4 primary purpose other than securing a proper adjudication of 5 the claim. 6 b. âProbable causeâ means the existence of reasonably known 7 facts and law that would lead a reasonable person to believe, 8 in good faith, that the civil action was legally and factually 9 justified at the time the civil action was initiated. 10 2. A person may bring a civil action for malicious 11 prosecution against a private party who initiated or caused to 12 be initiated a civil action against the person. 13 3. To prevail in an action brought under this section, the 14 plaintiff must prove all of the following: 15 a. The underlying civil action was brought by the defendant 16 and was decided or dismissed in the plaintiffâs favor. 17 b. The defendant lacked probable cause to bring the 18 underlying civil action. 19 c. The defendant acted with malice. 20 d. The plaintiff suffered actual damages proximately caused 21 by the malicious prosecution. 22 4. A plaintiff is not required to plead or prove arrest, 23 seizure of property, restraint on liberty, issuance of 24 injunction, or any other heightened or special injury beyond 25 the ordinary burdens or consequences of defending a civil 26 action. 27 5. This section applies only to malicious prosecution 28 actions between private parties. This section shall not be 29 construed to alter, expand, or limit any doctrine governing 30 standing to challenge governmental or public wrongs. 31